Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [624.7145] SERIAL NUMBERS; GHOST GUNS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section and sections 624.7146 and 624.7147, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Federal firearms licensee" means a licensed importer, manufacturer, or dealer under United States Code, title 18, section 921(a)(9-11). new text end new text begin (c) "Ghost gun" means a firearm or a finished or unfinished frame or receiver that: new text end new text begin (1) lacks a unique serial number engraved or imprinted in metal alloy on the frame or receiver; new text end new text begin (2) is undetectable by a metal detector under the terms of United States Code, title 18, section 922(p), or can be readily modified to become undetectable; or new text end new text begin (3) is manufactured by a three-dimensional printer or computer numerical control milling machine by a person who is not a federally licensed firearm manufacturer. new text end new text begin Ghost gun does not include any firearm or unfinished frame or receiver that is permanently inoperable; is an antique firearm, as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 3; or was manufactured prior to 1968. new text end new text begin (d) "Unfinished frame or receiver" means a forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that has reached a stage where it may be readily completed, assembled, or converted into a functional firearm. new text end new text begin (e) "Unique serial number" means the serial number and, if applicable, other information required under: new text end new text begin (1) United States Code, title 26, section 5842; new text end new text begin (2) United States Code, title 18, section 923; new text end new text begin (3) section 624.7147; or new text end new text begin (4) the law of any other state for the identification of firearms. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Alteration of serial numbers. new text end new text begin Any person who commits any of the following acts may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both: new text end new text begin (1) obliterates, removes, changes, or alters the unique serial number of a firearm; or new text end new text begin (2) receives or possesses a firearm, the unique serial number of which has been obliterated, removed, changed, or altered. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Prohibition on possession. new text end new text begin Any person who owns, possesses, or receives a ghost gun may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Sale, transfer, and distribution of ghost guns. new text end new text begin Any person who sells, transfers, or distributes a ghost gun may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Firearms without serial numbers. new text end new text begin (a) Any person who, on August 1, 2026, is in possession of a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver that lacks a unique serial number engraved or imprinted in metal alloy on the frame or receiver has 180 days to do one of the following: new text end new text begin (1) have a federal firearms licensee imprint a unique serial number on the firearm according to the requirements under section 624.7147; new text end new text begin (2) permanently remove the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver from the state; new text end new text begin (3) render the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver permanently inoperable; or new text end new text begin (4) surrender the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver to a law enforcement agency for destruction. new text end new text begin (b) Any person who receives an unfinished frame, receiver, or firearm without a unique serial number through inheritance and who is not otherwise prohibited from possessing the unfinished frame, receiver, or firearm, must, within 30 days after inheriting the unfinished frame, receiver, or firearm: new text end new text begin (1) have a federal firearms licensee imprint a unique serial number on the firearm according to the requirements of section 624.7147; new text end new text begin (2) permanently remove the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver from the state; new text end new text begin (3) render the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver permanently inoperable; or new text end new text begin (4) surrender the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver to a law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin (c) New residents of the state in possession of a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver that lacks a unique serial number must, within 60 days of arriving in the state: new text end new text begin (1) have a federal firearms licensee imprint a unique serial number on the firearm according to the requirements of section 624.7147; new text end new text begin (2) permanently remove the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver from the state; new text end new text begin (3) render the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver permanently inoperable; or new text end new text begin (4) surrender the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver to a law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) possession of a ghost gun by a federal firearms licensee or the sale, transfer, or distribution of a ghost gun to a federal firearms licensee; new text end new text begin (2) the transfer of a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver that lacks a unique serial number between the owner and a federal firearms licensee for the purposes of serialization under section 624.7147; new text end new text begin (3) a law enforcement officer for the purposes of enforcing this section, collecting evidence, or destroying a ghost gun; or new text end new text begin (4) a member of the United States armed forces for use in the course of the member's official duties. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin This section is enforceable under section 8.31. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [624.7146] ASSEMBLY AND MANUFACTURING OF FIREARMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Assemble" means to fit together component parts. new text end new text begin (c) "Manufacture" means to fabricate, make, form, produce, or construct by manual labor or machinery. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Assembling firearms; requirements; limitations. new text end new text begin (a) A person who is not a federal firearms licensee is prohibited from assembling or manufacturing more than three firearms in a calendar year. new text end new text begin (b) Before assembling or manufacturing a firearm, a person assembling or manufacturing a firearm that does not have a unique serial number or mark of identification imprinted on the frame or receiver must request a unique serial number from a federal firearms licensee that complies with the requirements in section 624.7147. new text end new text begin (c) Within ten days of assembling a firearm, the owner must have a federal firearms licensee imprint the firearm with the unique serial number assigned under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this section permits the assembly or manufacture of ghost guns. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Manufacturing prohibitions. new text end new text begin (a) It is unlawful for a person, other than a federal firearms licensee, to manufacture a firearm using a computer numerical control milling machine or three-dimensional printer. new text end new text begin (b) Any person who violates this subdivision may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Firearm design files. new text end new text begin (a) It is unlawful to sell, transfer, or distribute to a person in the state, other than to a federal firearms licensee, digital instructions in the form of computer-aided design files or other code or instructions stored and displayed in electronic format as a digital model that may be used to program a three-dimensional printer to manufacture a ghost gun. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin This section is enforceable under section 8.31. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [624.7147] SERIALIZATION OF FIREARMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A federal firearms licensee must comply with this subdivision when assigning and applying a unique serial number to a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver owned by a resident of the state. new text end new text begin (b) The unique serial number must be formatted with the federal firearms licensee's abbreviated federal firearms license number as a prefix, which is the first three and last five digits of the license number, followed by a hyphen, then followed by a number that the licensee has not previously assigned as a suffix. The serial number or numbers must be imprinted in a manner that accords with the requirements under federal law for affixing serial numbers to firearms, including the requirements that the serial number or numbers be at the minimum size and depth, and not susceptible to being readily obliterated, altered, or removed, and the licensee must retain records that accord with the requirements under federal law in the case of the sale of a firearm. The imprinting of any serial number upon an undetectable firearm must be done on a steel plaque under United States Code, title 18, section 922(p). new text end new text begin (c) A federal firearms licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique serial number on a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver under this section must maintain a record of each instance of imprinting a serial number indefinitely. A federal firearms licensee providing marking services under this section must make all records accessible for inspection upon the request of a state or local law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin (d) A federal firearms licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique serial number on a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver under this section must record the serial number at the time of every transaction involving the transfer of a firearm, rifle, shotgun, finished frame or receiver, or unfinished frame or receiver that has been marked in compliance with the federal guidelines under Code of Federal Regulations, title 27, section 478.124. new text end new text begin (e) By August 1, 2026, the commissioner of public safety must issue a public notice regarding the provisions of this section in order to educate the public. The notice must include posting on the Department of Public Safety's website and may include written notification or any other means of communication statewide to all Minnesota-based federal firearms licensees authorized to provide marking services under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Data classification. new text end new text begin Data related to unique serial numbers under subdivision 1, paragraph (c), is classified in section 13.87, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.667, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: S3661-1 609.667 FIREARMS; REMOVAL OR ALTERATION OF SERIAL NUMBER. Whoever commits any of the following acts may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both: (1) obliterates, removes, changes, or alters the serial number or other identification of a firearm; (2) receives or possesses a firearm, the serial number or other identification of which has been obliterated, removed, changed, or altered; or (3) receives or possesses a firearm that is not identified by a serial number. As used in this section, "serial number or other identification" means the serial number and other information required under United States Code, title 26, section 5842, for the identification of firearms.